Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-357
Essential services, defined.

Essential services shall mean those services necessary to safeguard the person or property of a vulnerable adult. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, sufficient and appropriate food and clothing, temperate and sanitary shelter, treatment for physical needs, and proper supervision.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 10.